Alaska statutes. Title 14. Education, Libraries, and Museums.
Article 3. General Provisions.

Sec. 14.42.990.
Definitions.

In this chapter, unless the context requires otherwise,

“board” means the board of directors of the corporation;

“commission” means the Alaska Commission on Postsecondary Education created in AS

14.42.015

;

“corporation” means the Alaska Student Loan Corporation created in AS

14.42.100

;

“education loan” means a loan that is eligible for financing or is financed from the education loan fund established in AS

14.42.210

;

“eligible student” means an individual who meets the eligibility requirements established by the federal guaranteed student loan program or as otherwise set out in this chapter;

“federal guaranteed student loan program” means the programs of the United States government that make postsecondary educational financial aid available under 20 U.S.C. 1070 — 1099c-2, as amended;

“repayment obligation” means an obligation to repay financial support that is financed from the education loan fund established in AS

14.42.210

or otherwise administered by the commission.

History.

(§ 16 ch 85 SLA 2001)